Hawaii statutes.
[§88-93.5] [Section
effective July 1, 2018.] Distribution of property in a divorce action.
(a) As used in this section:

"Alternate payee" means a spouse or
former spouse of a member or retirant who is recognized by a domestic relations
order as having a right to receive all or a portion of the benefits payable by
the system with respect to that member or retirant.

"Benefits payable with respect to a member
or retirant" means any payment required to be made to a member or
retirant.

"Domestic relations order" means a
judgment, decree, or order, including approval of a property settlement
agreement, that:

(1) Relates to the provision of marital property
rights to a spouse or former spouse of a member or retirant; and

(2) Is made pursuant to a domestic relations law of
this State or another state.

"Hawaii domestic relations order"
means a domestic relations order that:

(1) Creates or recognizes the right of an alternate
payee, or assigns to an alternate payee, the right to receive all or a portion
of the benefits payable with respect to a member or retirant under the system;

(2) Directs the system to disburse benefits to the
alternate payee; and

(3) Meets the requirements of this section.

(b) A Hawaii domestic relations order shall
clearly specify:

(1) The name and last known mailing address, if any,
of the member or retirant;

(2) The name and mailing address of the alternate
payee covered by the order;

(3) The amount or percentage of the member or
retirant's benefits to be paid by the system to the alternate payee, or the
manner in which the amount or percentage is to be determined;

(4) The number of payments or period to which the
order applies; and

(5) That the order applies to the system.

(c) If, pursuant to a Hawaii domestic
relations order, an alternate payee is receiving all or a portion of a
retirant's pension, annuity, or retirement allowance, the alternate payee shall
be entitled to receive a post retirement allowance as provided by section
88-90.

(d) A Hawaii domestic relations order shall
not:

(1) Purport to require the designation by the member
or retirant of a particular person as the recipient of benefits upon the death
of the member or retirant;

(2) Purport to require the selection of a particular
benefit payment plan or option or to limit the benefit payment plans or options
from which the member may select;

(3) Require any action on the part of the system
contrary to its governing laws or plan provisions other than the direct payment
of the benefit awarded to an alternate payee;

(4) Make the award to the alternate payee an interest
that is contingent on any condition other than those conditions resulting in
the liability of the system for payment under its plan provisions;

(5) Purport to give to someone other than a member or
retirant the right to designate a beneficiary or to choose any retirement plan
or option available from the system;

(6) Attach a lien to any part of amounts payable with
respect to a member or retirant;

(7) Award an alternate payee a portion of the benefits
payable with respect to a member or retirant under the system and purport to
require the system to make a lump sum payment of the awarded portion of the
benefits to the alternate payee that are not payable in a lump sum;

(8) Purport to require the system, without action by
the member, to terminate a member from membership or employment, to refund
contributions, or to retire a member;

(9) Provide any type or form of benefit, or any
option, not otherwise provided by the system;

(10) Provide increased benefits, determined on the
basis of actuarial value; or

(11) Require the system to provide benefits or refunds
to an alternate payee that are required to be paid to another alternate payee
pursuant to an earlier Hawaii domestic relations order.

(e) Upon receipt of a copy of the complaint
for divorce, certified by the clerk of the court in which the complaint was
filed, and a written request that identifies the member or retirant by name and
social security number and states the date of the marriage, the system shall
provide the spouse or former spouse of a member or retirant with the same
information that would be provided to the member or retirant on the member's or
retirant's benefits that is relevant to the spouse's or former spouse's
interest in the member's or retirant's benefits.

(f) A person who wishes to have the system
review a domestic relations order or a proposed domestic relations order to
establish whether the order or proposed order meets the requirements for a
Hawaii domestic relations order shall submit to the system a written request
for review and a copy of the order or proposed order. If the order has been
entered by a court, the copy of the order shall be certified by the clerk of
the court that entered the order. The order or proposed order shall be
reviewed as provided by this section.

The filing fee in effect at the time that an
order or proposed order is submitted shall be paid before the order or proposed
order is processed or reviewed. In addition, the system shall charge for legal
and actuarial services as provided by subsection (s).

Before any legal or actuarial services are
performed, the system shall notify the person who requested the review of the
order or proposed order that the services will be needed as part of the
review. The notification shall include an estimate of the extent of the
services and the estimated costs relating to those services. The charges for
legal and actuarial services shall be paid before the system may issue
notification of determination on an order or notification whether or not a
proposed order meets the requirements for a Hawaii domestic relations order.

If a domestic relations order is submitted for
review after it has been entered by the court and is thereafter amended with
the intention that it shall be a Hawaii domestic relations order, the member,
retirant, or the alternate payee shall submit a certified copy of the amended
order to the system. The system shall review any amended order that it
receives according to the same rules applicable to all other orders.

(g) The system shall review an order or
proposed order for compliance with the requirements imposed by this section.
Upon completion of the review:

(1) The system shall not issue a determination that a
proposed order is or is not a Hawaii domestic relations order but shall notify
the person who submitted the proposed order, in writing, and may also notify
the member or alternate payee whether the proposed order meets the requirements
for a Hawaii domestic relations order, identifying any provisions of this
section that the proposed order does not meet; and

(2) If the order has been entered by the court, the
system shall notify the member or retirant and the alternate payee in writing
of the determination that the order is or is not a Hawaii domestic relations
order, identifying any provisions of this section that the order does not meet.

(h) During any period not exceeding eighteen
months, beginning on the date on which the first payment would be required to
be made to the alternate payee under the domestic relations order, in which a
domestic relations order is under review to determine whether it is a Hawaii
domestic relations order, or in which a determination that an order is not
qualified is on appeal to the board or to a court, the system shall limit the
member's or retirant's rights in the member's or retirant's benefits to the
extent the system deems appropriate to protect the largest amount that would be
payable to the proposed alternate payee under the system's interpretation of
the domestic relations order. Any amounts not paid to the member or retirant
during this eighteen-month period shall be separately accounted for. If the
domestic relations order is determined to be a Hawaii domestic relations order
before the end of the eighteen-month period, the system shall pay benefits to
the member or retirant and the alternate payee in accordance with the Hawaii
domestic relations order and the terms of the plan, including any benefits
separately accounted for during the period between the date on which the first
payment was to be made under the Hawaii domestic relations order and the date
the determination is made. If the domestic relations order is finally
determined not to be a Hawaii domestic relations order, or if the
eighteen-month period expires without a determination that the domestic
relations order is a Hawaii domestic relations order, none of the amounts
separately accounted for shall be paid to the alternate payee, and the member
or retirant shall be entitled to the member's or retirant's full benefits in
accordance with the terms of this chapter, including any benefits that had been
separately accounted for and withheld from the member or retirant. If the
domestic relations order is determined to be a Hawaii domestic relations order
after the end of the eighteen-month period, or if the system later receives
another domestic relations order that is determined to be a Hawaii domestic
relations order, the Hawaii domestic relations order shall apply prospectively
only and shall not affect benefits already paid to the member or retirant.

(i) Subject to the limitations of applicable
statutes and this section, if a domestic relations order is determined to be a
Hawaii domestic relations order, the system shall pay benefits in accordance
with the order at the time benefits become payable to, or in the case of
contributions or hypothetical account balances, are withdrawn by, the member or
retirant. Any determination that an order is a Hawaii domestic relations order
is voidable or subject to modification if the system determines that the
provisions of the order have been changed or that circumstances relevant to the
determination have changed.

(j) If a member terminates membership in the
system by withdrawal of contributions or hypothetical account balance, the
system shall pay all or a portion of the amount withdrawn to any alternate
payee as directed by a Hawaii domestic relations order. Payment to any
alternate payee pursuant to this subsection shall be in a lump sum. If the
former member later resumes membership in the system, the system shall pay to
an alternate payee no portion of any benefits payable to the member or retirant
that result from the resumption of membership, even if those benefits result in
part from reinstatement of service credit initially credited during the
marriage.

(k) In order to receive credit for all service
represented by withdrawn or refunded contributions, a member, in reinstating
service credit by repaying amounts previously withdrawn or refunded, shall
repay the entire amount withdrawn or refunded, regardless of whether a portion
or all of the amount was paid to an alternate payee.

(l) When the system has not yet begun to make
payment to an alternate payee under this section and is provided with proof of
the death of the alternate payee, benefits payable with respect to the member
or retirant shall be paid without regard to the Hawaii domestic relations
order.

(m) When the system receives a certified copy
of a domestic relations order prior to a member's retirement, and if the
domestic relations order is determined to be a Hawaii domestic relations order,
the system, except as provided in subsection (j), shall pay the alternate payee
an amount that is the actuarial equivalent of the benefit that is awarded to
the alternate payee in the form of an annuity payable in equal monthly
installments for the life of the alternate payee.

Payment under this subsection shall be
determined as follows:

(1) As of the date payment to the alternate payee is
scheduled to begin, the system shall determine the single life annuity value of
the retirement benefit payable to the member;

(2) If the portion of the benefit awarded to the
alternate payee by the order is not clearly stated as a percentage of the
member's maximum retirement allowance, the system shall determine the
percentage of the member's maximum retirement allowance that is the equivalent
to the benefit awarded to the alternate payee;

(3) The single life annuity value determined by the
system shall be multiplied by the percentage of the member's maximum retirement
allowance awarded to the alternate payee. The result of this calculation shall
be actuarially converted to a single life annuity payable to the alternate
payee for the lifetime of the alternate payee;

(4) The benefit payable to the member shall be
reduced by an amount actuarially equivalent to the value of the benefit payable
to the alternate payee; payment by the system of the alternate payee's interest
as provided by this section shall have no effect on the right of a member to
name a beneficiary or the right of a member to choose an optional method of
payment upon retirement; and

(5) Payment of the alternate payee's interest under
this subsection shall be effective as of the same date that benefit payments
are effective for the member.

(n) When the system receives a certified copy
of a domestic relations order subsequent to the member's retirement, and if the
domestic relations order is determined to be a Hawaii domestic relations order,
the interest awarded to the alternate payee by the Hawaii domestic relations
order shall be paid as a portion of the retirement benefit the retirant is
receiving as follows:

(1) If the alternate payee is already a named
beneficiary under any option elected by the retirant at retirement, the benefit
to which the retirant is entitled, without regard to the Hawaii domestic
relations order, shall be apportioned between the retirant and the alternate
payee according to the terms of the Hawaii domestic relations order. Upon the
death of the retirant or the alternate payee, the benefit amount to be paid to
the survivor shall be the amount required under the option elected by the
retirant at retirement, as though no Hawaii domestic relations order had
existed; or

(2) If the alternate payee is not a named beneficiary
under the option elected by the retirant at retirement, the benefit to which
the retirant is entitled without regard to the Hawaii domestic relations order,
shall be apportioned between the retirant and the alternate payee according to
the terms of the Hawaii domestic relations order. If the retirant predeceases
the alternate payee, payments to the alternate payee shall cease and payments
to the retirant's named beneficiary or beneficiaries shall be made as required
under the option elected by the retirant at retirement, as though no Hawaii
domestic relations order had existed. If the alternate payee predeceases the
retirant, the benefit then being paid to the retirant shall be increased by the
amount of the benefit that was being paid to the alternate payee at time of
death.

Payment according to the terms of the Hawaii
domestic relations order under this subsection shall commence as of the first
day of the month following the date upon which the order is determined to be
qualified, unless the parties jointly direct that payment shall commence at a
later date.

(o) If a retirant returns to employment
requiring active membership in the system:

(1) Payments to an alternate payee pursuant to a
Hawaii domestic relations order shall not be suspended; and

(2) The system shall pay to an alternate payee no
portion of any benefits payable to the retirant that result from the resumption
of membership.

(p) For the purpose of calculating earnings
limitations for retirants who have been restored to service, the retirant's
maximum retirement allowance shall be considered to be the amount that would
have been paid if there had not been any Hawaii domestic relations order
applicable to the retirant.

(q) A court does not have jurisdiction over
the system with respect to a divorce or other domestic relations action in
which an alternate payee's right to receive all or a portion of the benefits
payable to a member or retirant is created or established. A determination by
the system that a domestic relations order is not a Hawaii domestic relations
order shall be subject to review as provided in chapter 91 and the system's
rules relating to contested cases. The system shall not be made party to any other
judicial proceedings except as provided in this subsection. A party to any
action who attempts to make the system a party to the action contrary to this
subsection shall be liable to the system for the system's costs and attorney's
fees in the action, including attorneys' fee and costs for obtaining a
dismissal.

(r) If a member or retirant, or the
beneficiary or estate of either, receives the amount of any distribution that
should have been paid by the system to the spouse or former spouse of the member
or retirant, the recipient shall be designated a constructive trustee for the
amount received and shall immediately transmit that amount to the person to
whom the amount should have been paid. If a spouse or former spouse of a
member or retirant, or the estate, heirs, or legatees of the spouse or former
spouse receive any amount of a distribution that should have been paid to a
member or retirant, or the estate, heirs, or legatees of either, the recipient
shall be designated a constructive trustee for the amount received and shall
immediately transmit that amount to the member or retirant or other person to
whom the amount should have been paid. If a member, retirant, or the
beneficiary, estate, heirs, or legatees of either, receives any amount that should
not have been paid by the system, the recipient shall be designated a
constructive trustee for the amount received and shall immediately transmit
that amount to the system. If an alternate payee or the estate, heirs, or
legatee of the alternate payee, receives any amount that should not have been
paid by the system, the recipient shall be designated a constructive trustee
for the amount received and shall immediately transmit that amount to the
system.

(s) The board shall adopt rules in accordance
with chapter 91, and adopt forms as it deems necessary to effectuate this
section. The board, by motion at a duly noticed meeting of the board, may
establish and revise from time to time:

(1) A filing fee for processing and review of
domestic relations orders and proposed domestic relations orders for the
purposes of this section;

(2) A schedule of charges for legal and actuarial
services incurred by the system in the review and processing of domestic
relations orders and proposed Hawaii domestic relations orders for the purposes
of this section; and

(3) A required form or forms for Hawaii domestic
relations orders. [L 2016, c 263, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next